Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 13 Abandoned Vehicles
§ 31-13-114.
Licensing of storage and disposal facilities; records by licensees.

No person shall, unless licensed to do so by the department:

Sell as a business used parts of or used accessories for vehicles;

Wreck or dismantle vehicles as a business for resale of the parts thereof;

Rebuild wrecked or dismantled vehicles as a business; or

Engage as a business in the storage or disposal of vehicles, the parts of which are suitable for reuse or recycling.

Application for a license shall be made on a form prescribed by the department containing the name of the applicant, the address or addresses where the business or activity is to be conducted, the nature of the business or activity, enumerated in subsection (a) of this section, the residence address of the applicant if an individual, the names and residence addresses of the partners of the applicant if a partnership, the names and residence of the principal officers of the applicant, and the state of its incorporation if a corporation. The application shall be verified by the oath or affirmation of the applicant if a sole proprietorship, by a partner if a partnership, or by an officer if a corporation. The application shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) to be paid into the highway fund.

The department shall issue to an applicant a license to carry on and conduct a business or activity as specified in the application for a period of one (1) year following the date on which the license is issued. The department shall reissue the license to the applicant when it is satisfied the applicant has complied with this act and the laws of this state relating to registration and certificates of titles of vehicles.

The department shall suspend or revoke a license, upon fifteen (15) days prior written notice by certified mail and after giving the licensee an opportunity for a hearing, if it finds:

The license was fraudulently procured or erroneously issued; or

The applicant, or any partner or principal officer of the applicant, if a partnership or a corporation, has failed to comply with this section and the laws of the state relating to registration of and certificates of title of vehicles.

Every licensee shall maintain for three (3) years, in the form the department prescribes, a record of:

Every vehicle or vehicle body, chassis or engine of or for a vehicle received or acquired by him, its description and identifying number, the date of its receipt or acquisition, and the name and address of the person from whom received or acquired;

Every vehicle or vehicle body, chassis or engine disposed of by him, its description and identifying number, the date of its disposition, and the name and address of the person to whom disposed; and

Every vehicle wrecked or dismantled by him and the date of its wrecking or dismantling. Every such record shall be open to inspection by any representative of the department or police officer during reasonable business hours.

The department shall not issue a license under this law to any person who is located in any area with a residential zoning.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 217, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-346.1; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

31-14-112

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

31-13-112

; Laws 1989, ch. 256, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present location of former §

31-13-114

, see §

31-13-116

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence in subsection (c), see § 31-13-101(a)(x).

§ 31-13-115.
Providing disposal facilities by state.

If otherwise not economically available to resident owners of vehicles, the department or appropriate state agency shall provide, by contract to private persons or political subdivisions, facilities for the collection and proper disposal of the vehicles at the request of the owner.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 217, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-346.2; W.S. 1977, §

31-14-113

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

31-13-113

; Laws 1989, ch. 256, § 3.

§ 31-13-116.
Penalty for violation.

Every person convicted of violating this act may be fined not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 217, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-346.3; W.S. 1977, §

31-14-114

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

31-13-114

; Laws 1989, ch. 256, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-13-101(a)(x).